Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-1906
Test results; release or disclosure; when.

The employer or its, his, or her agents shall not release or disclose the test results to the public, except that such results shall be released as required by law or to the employee upon request. Test results may be released to those officers, agents, or employees of the employer who need to know the information for reasons connected with their employment.

Laws 1988, LB 582, § 6.